Missouri, session 2026, HB3157.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 196, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto fifteen new sections, to
be known as sections 196.3070, 196.3073, 196.3076, 196.3079, 196.3082, 196.3085,
196.3088, 196.3091, 196.3094, 196.3097, 196.3100, 196.3103, 196.3106, 196.3109, and
196.3112, to read as follows:
196.3070. As used in sections 196.3070 to 196.3112, the following terms mean:
(1) "Applicant", a person who applies to the department to receive a license to
operate as a mobile food vendor;
(2) "Department", the department of health and senior services;
(3) "Food", the same meaning given to the term in section 196.010;
(4) "License holder", a person who holds a mobile food vendor license issued
under sections 196.3070 to 196.3112;
(5) "Local authority", any municipality, county, public health authority, or other
political subdivision of this state;
(6) "Mobile food unit", any vehicle, trailer, cart, or other conveyance that
operates as a food establishment and that is designed to be readily movable;
(7) "Mobile food vendor" or "vendor", any person who dispenses food from a
mobile food unit for immediate service or consumption;
(8) "Municipality", any city, town, or village located wholly or partially within a
county;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HCS HB 3157 2
(9) "Prepackaged food", any commercially labeled and processed food that is
prepackaged to prevent direct human contact with the food product on distribution
from the manufacturer, food establishment, or other approved source.
196.3073. 1. Notwithstanding any authority granted under chapter 192 or any
other provision of law, sections 196.3070 to 196.3112 preempt any local ordinance,
resolution, rule, or regulation concerning the licensing or permitting of mobile food
vendors or the operation of mobile food units.
2. A local authority shall not require a mobile food vendor holding a valid
statewide mobile food vendor license to obtain an additional local license or permit as a
condition of operating a mobile food unit.
3. A local authority shall not adopt or enforce any regulation that conflicts with
or imposes requirements inconsistent with sections 196.3070 to 196.3112.
196.3076. 1. A person shall not operate as a mobile food vendor in this state
unless the person holds a mobile food vendor license issued by the department. A
separate license is required for each mobile food unit a mobile food vendor operates.
2. A mobile food vendor license issued by the department is valid throughout the
state and authorizes operation in any jurisdiction, subject to compliance with state law.
3. A local authority shall not prohibit the operation in its jurisdiction of a mobile
food vendor who holds a mobile food vendor license issued by the department and
complies with all other state and local laws not in conflict with sections 196.3070 to
196.3112.
196.3079. 1. The department shall prescribe a written application for a mobile
food vendor license. The department shall make the application available to applicants
in person and on the department's website.
2. An applicant for a mobile food vendor license shall submit an application to
the department on the form the department prescribes. The application shall contain
the following information:
(1) The applicant's name, address, and telephone number;
(2) The name, address, and telephone number of any associated entity or
organization the applicant is representing and copies of documents verifying that
relationship;
(3) The applicant's primary residences and business addresses during the twelve
months preceding the date of the application;
(4) The food the applicant proposes to sell to enable the department to establish
the applicant's food type classification;
(5) A statement of whether the applicant has previously been denied a mobile
food vendor license, or had a mobile food vendor license suspended or revoked, in this

HCS HB 3157 3
state or any other state or local jurisdiction and the reasons for any denial, suspension,
or revocation; and
(6) The vehicle license number, description, identification number, registration,
proof of vehicle insurance, and proof of any additional licenses or permits required by
this state for the mobile food unit the applicant is applying for a license to operate.
3. The department may require an applicant to submit additional information.
4. An applicant shall submit a separate application for each mobile food unit to
be licensed under sections 196.3070 to 196.3112.
5. An applicant's failure to submit a complete application may result in denial of
a license.
6. A person shall not intentionally provide false information or intentionally
omit requested information on an application.
7. The department shall develop a guide on the mobile food vendor licensing
procedures. The guide shall be available at the department's office and on the
department's website. The guide shall include the following information:
(1) Instructions for obtaining, maintaining, and renewing a mobile food vendor
license; and
(2) A description of the department's standards for inspecting a mobile food
unit.
196.3082. 1. Within thirty days after the date the department receives a
complete mobile food vendor license application, the department or a local authority
acting under a collaborative agreement as provided by section 196.3100 shall conduct a
health inspection of the applicant's mobile food unit listed on the application. The
department shall not issue a license to operate any mobile food unit that does not pass a
health inspection.
2. The department shall ensure that an applicant's mobile food unit is safe for
preparing, handling, and selling food and that an applicant is in compliance with all
applicable laws and rules.
196.3085. 1. The department shall issue a mobile food vendor license to an
applicant who submits a complete application, pays any required fee, and meets the
department's licensing requirements and whose mobile food unit passes a health
inspection.
2. A license issued under this section expires on the first anniversary of the date
of issuance.
3. Before expiration of a license, the department shall send notice of the
expiration to the mobile food vendor. The vendor shall submit a license renewal
application before the date the license expires.

HCS HB 3157 4
4. A licensed mobile food vendor may continue to operate while the vendor's
application for license renewal is pending with the department.
196.3088. 1. A mobile food vendor license issued under sections 196.3070 to
196.3112 is not transferable and does not authorize the activities of any person other
than the person who holds the license.
2. The sale of the mobile food unit identified in a mobile food vendor license
application, when replaced by another mobile food unit, does not invalidate the license
or require issuance of a new license.
3. A license holder who replaces a mobile food unit with another unit shall
provide to the department the information required by section 196.3079 for the
replacement unit and ensure the replacement unit is inspected as required by section
196.3082. The health inspection shall be conducted as soon as practicable but not later
than the thirtieth calendar day after the date the department receives the information
required under this section.
4. The recipient of transferred mobile food vendor business assets shall apply for
and obtain a new mobile food vendor license before operating as a mobile food vendor.
196.3091. 1. The department may charge a fee for each mobile food vendor
license application submitted and each license issued or renewed under sections
196.3070 to 196.3112. The department may establish a schedule of fees based on the
license classifications described in section 196.3097. The department may set the fees in
amounts necessary to cover the costs of administering sections 196.3070 to 196.3112.
2. The department may charge a fee for a health inspection of an applicant's
mobile food unit required under section 196.3082. The department shall set the fee in an
amount that covers the cost of conducting a health inspection under that section.
3. At the time the department issues or renews a mobile food vendor license, the
department shall charge a fee for a health inspection required under section 196.3100.
The department shall set the fee in an amount based on the average cost of conducting a
health inspection multiplied by the number of annual health inspections required during
the next year for the mobile food vendor classification type as described by section
196.3097.
4. The department shall deposit all fees collected under this section into a
separate account in the Missouri public health services fund established in section
192.900 to be used for the administration of sections 196.3070 to 196.3112.
196.3094. A mobile food vendor shall:
(1) Submit to and pass any required health inspection conducted under section
196.3100;
(2) Comply with all laws and rules regarding food safety; and

HCS HB 3157 5
(3) Display the mobile food vendor license and health inspection certificate in a
conspicuous location for public view.
196.3097. 1. The department shall establish by rule classifications of mobile food
vendors for purposes of conducting health inspections as follows:
(1) Mobile food type I vendor for a vendor who dispenses prepackaged foods,
who does not dispense food that requires time or temperature control for safety, and
who poses a low risk of harm to the public;
(2) Mobile food type II vendor for a vendor who dispenses food that requires
limited handling and preparation; and
(3) Mobile food type III vendor for a vendor who prepares, cooks, holds, and
serves food from a mobile food unit.
2. The rules adopted under this section shall specify the categories of foods that
mobile food vendors in each classification may serve.
3. A mobile food vendor who seeks to serve food that may require the vendor's
reclassification shall notify the department of the nature of the food to be sold. The
department, or a local authority in a collaborative agreement with the department
under section 196.3100, may conduct a health inspection and reclassify the vendor in
accordance with the rules adopted under this section.
196.3100. 1. The department shall ensure ongoing, randomized health
inspections are conducted on each licensed mobile food vendor based on the mobile
food vendor's classification and previous health inspection results.
2. Upon request by a local authority, the department may enter into a
collaborative agreement with the local authority for conducting health inspections. The
department shall reimburse the local authority acting under a collaborative agreement
for the cost of conducting a health inspection from the separate account in the Missouri
public health services fund established in section 196.3091.
3. At a frequency to be determined by the department, a mobile food vendor
shall make available to the department a list of all locations at which the vendor intends
to operate, to the best of the vendor's knowledge.
196.3103. 1. The department or a local authority may investigate a mobile food
vendor if there is reasonable suspicion to believe the vendor is violating the law or upon
receipt of a health or safety complaint. The local authority shall report suspected
violations of state law to the department and may recommend the department suspend
or revoke a mobile food vendor license.
2. The mobile food vendor shall cooperate with the department or local
authority during an investigation. Failure to cooperate with the department or local
authority may result in suspension or revocation of a license.

HCS HB 3157 6
3. Sections 196.3070 to 196.3112 shall not be construed to impede an
investigation of a reported foodborne illness by the department or local authority.
196.3106. 1. The department may refuse to issue or renew a mobile food vendor
license for one or any combination of causes stated in subsection 2 of this section. The
department shall notify the applicant in writing of the reasons for the refusal and shall
advise the applicant of his or her right to file a complaint with the administrative
hearing commission as provided by chapter 621.
2. The department may cause a complaint to be filed with the administrative
hearing commission as provided by chapter 621 against any license holder or any person
who has failed to renew or has surrendered his or her mobile food vendor license for any
one or any combination of the following causes:
(1) Violation of any provision of sections 196.3070 to 196.3112 or any rule
adopted under sections 196.3070 to 196.3112;
(2) Obtaining a license by means of fraud, misrepresentation, or concealment of
a material fact;
(3) Use of fraud or misrepresentation or the making of a false statement in
connection with the sale of food while operating as a mobile food vendor;
(4) Three or more citations during a twelve-month period for a violation of any
provision of sections 196.3070 to 196.3112 or any rules adopted under sections 196.3070
to 196.3112; or
(5) Other material facts or conditions related to the applicant or application that
provide reasonable justification for the denial, suspension, or revocation of the license,
as determined by the department.
3. The department shall not deny, suspend, or revoke a mobile food vendor
license for any cause not stated in subsection 2 of this section.
4. After the filing of such complaint, the proceedings shall be conducted in
accordance with the provisions of chapter 621. Upon a finding by the administrative
hearing commission that the grounds provided in subsection 2 of this section for
disciplinary action are met, the department may, singly or in combination, censure or
place the person named in the complaint on probation or suspension or revoke the
mobile food vendor license on such terms and conditions as the department deems
appropriate.
5. A license holder who continues to operate after the department suspends or
revokes the license holder's mobile food vendor license is subject to an administrative
penalty in an amount to be determined by the department.
6. The department may apply to any court of competent jurisdiction for, and the
court shall have jurisdiction upon hearing and for cause shown to grant, a temporary or

HCS HB 3157 7
permanent injunction to restrain any person from operating as a mobile food vendor in
this state without a mobile food vendor license issued by the department.
196.3109. 1. The department may apply to the administrative hearing
commission for an emergency suspension or restriction of a mobile food vendor license
if the department has reasonable cause to believe that the license holder's operations
pose an imminent threat to the public health and safety.
2. The department shall submit to the administrative hearing commission
supporting affidavits and records, together with a complaint alleging the facts in
support of the department's request for an emergency suspension or restriction of a
license, and shall supply the administrative hearing commission with the last home or
business addresses on file with the department for the license holder. Within one
business day of the filing of the complaint, the administrative hearing commission shall
return a service packet to the department. The service packet shall include the
department's complaint and any affidavits or records the department intends to rely on
that have been filed with the administrative hearing commission. The service packet
may contain other information in the discretion of the administrative hearing
commission. Within twenty-four hours of receiving the packet, the department shall
either personally serve the license holder the service packet or leave a copy of the service
packet at all of the license holder's current addresses on file with the department.
3. Within five days of the department's filing of the complaint, the
administrative hearing commission shall review the information submitted by the
department and shall issue its findings of fact and conclusions of law. If the
administrative hearing commission finds that there is reasonable cause for the
department to believe that the license holder's operations pose an imminent threat to
the public health and safety, the administrative hearing commission shall enter the
order requested by the department. The order shall be effective upon personal service
or by leaving a copy at all of the license holder's current addresses on file with the
department.
4. (1) The administrative hearing commission shall hold an evidentiary hearing
on the record within forty-five days of the department's filing of the complaint to
determine if cause for discipline exists under the provisions of sections 196.3070 to
196.3112 and to determine whether the initial order entered by the commission shall
continue in effect. Prior to the hearing, the license holder may file affidavits and
certified court records for consideration by the administrative hearing commission. The
administrative hearing commission may grant a request for a continuance but shall in
any event hold the hearing within one hundred twenty days of the department's initial
filing. The department shall be granted leave to amend its complaint if it is more than

HCS HB 3157 8
thirty days prior to the hearing, or within thirty days prior to the hearing upon a
showing of good cause.
(2) If no cause for discipline is found following an evidentiary hearing, the
administrative hearing commission shall issue findings of fact, conclusions of law, and
an order terminating the commission's initial order imposing an emergency suspension
or restriction of the license.
(3) If the administrative hearing commission finds cause for discipline following
an evidentiary hearing, the commission shall issue findings of fact and conclusions of
law and order the emergency suspension or restriction to remain in full force and effect
pending a disciplinary hearing before the department. The department shall hold a
hearing following the certification of the record by the administrative hearing
commission and may impose discipline otherwise authorized by state law.
5. Any action under this section shall be in addition to and not in lieu of any
discipline otherwise in the department's power to impose and may be brought
concurrently with other actions.
6. If the administrative hearing commission does not grant an initial order
imposing an emergency suspension or restriction of the license as described in
subsection 3 of this section, the department shall remove all reference to such emergency
suspension or restriction from its public records.
196.3112. 1. The department may adopt rules to implement sections 196.3070 to
196.3112. The rules shall be narrowly tailored to address a demonstrable health or
safety risk.
2. The department shall not adopt rules that serve to:
(1) Limit the number of mobile food vendor licenses the department may issue;
(2) Address the hours of operation for mobile food vendors;
(3) Restrict a mobile food vendor's propane capacity below the capacity state
law allows for commercial vehicles;
(4) Require a mobile food vendor to operate outside a specific perimeter of a
commercial establishment or restaurant;
(5) Require a mobile food vendor to enter into any agreement with a commercial
establishment or restaurant except as necessary to properly dispose of grease and other
cooking waste;
(6) Require a mobile food unit to have an operational handwashing sink if the
vendor sells only prepackaged food;
(7) Require a mobile food vendor to associate with a commissary if the mobile
food unit carries the equipment necessary to comply with state law and properly
disposes of grease and other cooking waste;

HCS HB 3157 9
(8) Require a mobile food unit to be in constant motion except when serving
customers;
(9) Require a mobile food vendor to submit a mobile food unit to an additional
fire inspection if the vendor demonstrates that the mobile food unit passed a state or
local fire inspection within the preceding twelve months;
(10) Require a mobile food vendor to submit to health inspections other than an
inspection the department, or a local authority under a collaborative agreement,
conducts unless the department is investigating a reported foodborne illness; or
(11) Impose inspection, equipment, or operational requirements beyond those
established by the department under state law.
3. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is
created under the authority delegated in this section shall become effective only if it
complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable,
section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers
vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the
effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional,
then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August
28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
✔